Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 11

Document Requirements

43-38-1101. Filing requirements.

The form and filing of a document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the secretary of state.

This chapter must require or permit filing the document in the office of the secretary of state.

The document must contain the information required by this chapter and any applicable rules. It may contain other information as well.

The document must be capable of being printed in ink in a clear and legible fashion on one (1) side of letter size paper.

The document must be in the English language. A cooperative's or other business entity's name need not be in English, if written in English letters, or Arabic or Roman numerals.

The document must be executed:

By the president of the board of directors of a cooperative, or by another of its authorized officers, if a cooperative action is taken;

If directors of a cooperative have not been selected or the cooperative has not been formed, by an organizer; or

If the business entity is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing the document must sign it and state beneath or opposite the signature the person's name and the capacity in which the person signs. The document may, but need not, contain:

An attestation by the secretary or an assistant secretary;

An acknowledgment, verification, or proof; or

The date the document is signed, except that the date is required for the annual report for the secretary of state.

If the secretary of state, pursuant to statutory authority, has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, then the document must be in or on the prescribed form.

The document must be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing and must be accompanied by the current filing fee, and any tax, license fee, interest, or penalty required by this chapter. If the secretary of state has prescribed a mandatory method of filing, then the document must be filed in the prescribed manner.

The document must contain a statement that makes it clear that the document is being filed pursuant to the Tennessee Processing Cooperative Law.

The secretary of state may promulgate appropriate rules establishing acceptable methods for execution of any document to be filed with the secretary of state.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, whenever this title requires that an application or other document submitted to the secretary of state for filing be accompanied by a certificate from the commissioner of revenue reciting that the business has properly filed all reports and paid all required taxes and penalties, the certificate requirement is met, and a paper certificate need not accompany the application or other document, if the commissioner provides to the secretary of state electronic verification of the required information. Upon request of the person seeking certificate information, the commissioner shall provide to the secretary of state verification in lieu of a paper certificate.

Any Tennessee cooperative that has not timely filed with the department of revenue such information as required by the commissioner of revenue under prior law is subject to administrative dissolution in accordance with the procedures specified in § 43-38-1004. Upon certification by the commissioner that it has complied with the information reporting requirements that were required under prior law, a cooperative that has been administratively dissolved or that has had its certificate of authority revoked for failure to timely file this information may be reinstated.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33; 2020, ch. 719, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), added “The form and filing of”, and substituted “all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements” for “any other section that adds to or varies these requirements”; added “and any applicable rules.” at the end of the first sentence in (c); in (d), substituted “capable of being printed” for “typewritten or printed” and deleted “or legal” preceding “size paper.”; added the second sentence in (i); in (j), substituted “that the document is being” for “that it is being” and “Cooperative Law” for “Cooperative Act”; in (k), substituted “may promulgate” for “has the power to promulgate” and deleted “and regulations” following “appropriate rules”; and deleted “provision of the” preceding “law to the contrary” near the beginning of (l ).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

43-38-1102. Forms and filing methods.

The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish forms and filing methods for all filings required by this title. If the secretary of state so requires, then use of these forms and filing methods is mandatory.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33; 2020, ch. 719, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish on request forms for:“(1) Articles of organization;“(2) Certificate of formation; and“(3) The annual report.“If the secretary of state so requires, use of these forms shall be mandatory.“(b) The secretary of state may prescribe and, if prescribed by the secretary of state, shall furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this chapter. Use of these request forms is not mandatory.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

43-38-1103. Filing, service and copying fees.

The office of the secretary of state shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this chapter are delivered for filing; and for purposes of this chapter, no document is considered delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing unless accompanied by the fee:

Document Fee

Articles including designation of initial registered office and agent as provided in subsection (d)

Certificate of formation $20.00

Application for reserved cooperative name 20.00

Application for use of indistinguishable name 20.00

Notice of transfer of cancellation of reserved name 20.00

Application for and renewal of registered name 20.00

Application for or change, cancellation, or renewal of assumed name 20.00

Cooperative's statement of change of registered agent, registered office, or both 20.00

Agent's statement of change of registered office 5.00 (per cooperative, but not less than 20.00)

Agent's statement of resignation 20.00

Articles of amendment 20.00

Amended and restated articles 20.00

Restatement of articles 20.00

Articles of correction 20.00

Certificate of merger 100.00

Articles of termination by organizers 20.00

Notice of dissolution 20.00

Articles of revocation or dissolution 20.00

Articles of termination 20.00

Certificate of administrative dissolution No fee

Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution 70.00

Articles of termination following administrative dissolution 100.00

Certificate of reinstatement No fee

Decree of judicial dissolution No fee

Annual report as provided in subsection (d)

Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this chapter 20.00

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) each time process is served on the secretary of state under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs, if it prevails in the proceeding.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for copying all filed documents relating to a cooperative. All such copies will be certified or validated by the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall collect from each cooperative, if applicable, an annual fee equal to fifty dollars ($50.00) per each cooperative member in existence on the date of the initial filing, and each year thereafter, based on the number of cooperative members in existence on the date of the filing for the annual report, with a minimum fee of three hundred dollars ($300) and a maximum fee of three thousand dollars ($3,000).

In addition to the other filing requirements of this chapter, a copy of all documents specified in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(11)-(a)(20) shall also be filed in the office of the register of deeds in the county where a cooperative has its principal office, if the principal office is in Tennessee, and in the case of a merger, in the county in which the new or surviving cooperative shall have its principal office, if the principal office is in Tennessee. The register of deeds may charge five dollars ($5.00), plus fifty cents (50¢) per page in excess of five (5) pages for this filing.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.

43-38-1104. Corrections.

A cooperative may correct a document filed with the office of the secretary of state, if the document:

Contains an incorrect statement; or

Was defectively executed, attested, sealed, certified, or acknowledged.

A document is corrected:

By preparing articles of correction that:

Describe the document, including its filing date, or attach a copy of it to the articles;

Specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution was defective; and

Correct the incorrect statement of defective execution; and

By delivering the articles of correction to the office of the secretary of state for filing.

Articles of correction are effective on the effective time and date of the document they correct, except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.

43-38-1105. Filing duty of secretary of state.

If the form and filing of a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of this section, and of all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements, then the secretary of state must file it.

The secretary of state files a document by stamping or otherwise endorsing “Filed”, together with the secretary of state's name and official title and the date and time of receipt, on the document. After filing a document, except for filings pursuant to §§ 43-38-109 and 43-38-120, the secretary of state shall deliver the document, with the filing fee receipt attached, or acknowledgment of receipt if no fee is required, to the cooperative or its representative in due course. A cooperative or its representative may present to the office of the secretary of state an exact or conformed copy of the document presented for filing, together with the document; and, in that event, the secretary of state shall stamp or otherwise endorse the exact or conformed copy “Filed”, together with the secretary of state's name and official title and the date and time of receipt, and immediately return the exact or conformed copy to the party filing the original of the document.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document, then the secretary of state shall return it to the cooperative or its representative immediately after the document was received for filing, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

The secretary of state's duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. The secretary of state's filing or refusing to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document;

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect; or

Establish that a document purporting to be an exact or conformed copy is in fact an exact or conformed copy.

Any cooperative document that meets the requirements of this chapter and all applicable rules for filing and recording must be received, filed, and recorded by the appropriate office, upon payment of the appropriate fees and taxes, if any, notwithstanding any contrary requirements found in any other laws of this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33; 2020, ch. 719, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), inserted “the form and filing of” and substituted “this section, and of all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements, then” for “§ 43-38-1101,”; inserted “then” in (c); and in (e), inserted “and all applicable rules” and deleted “provisions of the” preceding “laws of this state.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

43-38-1106. Appeal of refusal to file document.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing, the cooperative may appeal the refusal to the chancery court of Davidson County. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the secretary of state's explanation of the refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Any judicial review of the secretary of state's refusal to file a document shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.

43-38-1107. Copy as evidence.

A certificate attached or certification affixed to a copy of a document filed by the secretary of state, bearing the secretary of state's signature, which may be in facsimile, and the seal of this state, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the secretary of state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.

43-38-1108. Penalty for signing false document.

A person commits a Class B misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), if the person signs a document, knowing it to be false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the office of the secretary of state or other required office for filing.

The offense created by this section is in addition to any other offense created by law for the same conduct.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-38-1109. Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in subsection (b), and in §§ 43-38-202 and 43-38-1104(c), a document accepted for filing is effective:

At the time of filing on the date it is filed by the secretary of state, as evidenced by the office of the secretary of state's date and time endorsement on the original document; and

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so, the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but not time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the ninetieth day after the date it is filed with the office of the secretary of state.

The office of the secretary of state shall not file any articles unless that document designates the registered agent and registered office of such cooperative in accordance with § 43-38-107. The office of the secretary of state shall not file any other document presented by the cooperative for filing under this chapter, if at the time of filing, the cooperative does not have a registered agent and registered office designated at that time, unless at the time the document is received for filing, the office of the secretary of state also receives for filing a statement designating a registered agent or registered office or both.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.